New York, session 2025-2026, A638.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, 2 where COVID-19 testing of students, teachers and staff is mandated by 3 the state pursuant to executive order or other directive relating to 4 in-person instruction and settings, the state shall reimburse all non- 5 public and private schools that are subject to such mandate for the 6 costs associated with such testing requirements. The commissioner of 7 education shall adopt necessary rules and/or regulations and provide a 8 process and procedure to ensure the reimbursement of eligible costs 9 pursuant to this act. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01373-01-5